Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2101
Sudden infant death syndrome; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that sudden infant death syndrome is the sudden, unexpected death of an apparently healthy infant less than one year of age that remains unexplained after the performance of a complete postmortem investigation, including an autopsy, an examination of the scene of death, and a review of the medical history. The Legislature further finds that, despite the success of prevention efforts, sudden infant death syndrome has been the second leading cause of death for infants in Nebraska for the last twenty years. Although there are no known ways to prevent sudden infant death syndrome in all cases, there are steps that parents and caregivers can take to reduce the risk of sudden infant death. The Legislature further finds and declares that there is a present and growing need to provide additional programs aimed at reducing the number of cases of sudden infant death syndrome in Nebraska.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 147.